Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-936
Adult Diagnostic and Evaluation Services Program; duties.

There is hereby established the Adult Diagnostic and Evaluation Services Program within the Division of Adult Services. Subject to the supervision of the assistant director of the division, the program shall:

(1) Establish programs for the observation, testing, and examination, both mental and physical, of adult individuals within the jurisdiction of the Department of Correctional Services;

(2) Recommend treatment for and disposition of adult individuals within the jurisdiction of the department; and

(3) Cooperate with the division to establish and maintain rehabilitation programs for individuals committed or referred to any institution within the division.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 14;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 80.